Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
436B

UNIFORM
PROFESSIONAL AND VOCATIONAL LICENSING ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

436B-1 Short title

436B-2 General definitions

436B-3 Applicability; prevailing provisions;
construction

436B-4 Rules

Part II. Organization

436B-5 Conditions of office

436B-6 Organization of boards

436B-7 Powers and duties of licensing authority

436B-8 Delegation of authority

436B-8.5 Review of examinations

Part III. Application for Licensure

436B-9 Action on applications; abandoned
applications

436B-10 Application and requirements for
licensure

436B-11 Additional licensure requirements

436B-12 Criminal conviction

436B-13 Renewal of license

436B-13.3 Inactive license; reactivation of
inactive license

436B-14 Restoration of forfeited license

436B-14.5 Extension of licenses for members of the
armed

forces, National Guard, and reserves

436B-14.6 Licensure by endorsement or licensure by

reciprocity; experience requirements

436B-14.7 Licensure by endorsement or licensure by

reciprocity; initial acceptance by
affidavit;

temporary license; military spouse

436B-14.8 Licensure; acceptance of military
education,

training, or service

436B-15 Fees and expenses

436B-15.5 Conversion of license

Part IV. Licensee Reporting Requirements

436B-16 Notice of judgments, penalties

436B-17 Filing of current addresses

Part V. Licensing Sanctions

436B-18 Disciplinary action

436B-19 Grounds for refusal to renew, reinstate
or

restore and for revocation, suspension,

denial, or condition of licenses

463B-19.5 Suspension or denial of license for
noncompliance

with child support order

436B-19.6 Denial or suspension of license for
default of

student loan, student loan repayment
contract, or

scholarship contract

436B-20 Suspended license

436B-21 Revoked license

436B-22 Relinquishment no bar to jurisdiction

436B-23 Summary suspension

436B-24 Hearings

436B-25 Judicial review by circuit court

Part VI. Civil and Criminal Sanctions

436B-26 No compensation for unlicensed activity;
civil

action

436B-26.5 Citation for unlicensed activity; civil
penalties

436B-27 Civil and criminal sanctions for
unlicensed

activity; fines; injunctive relief;
damages;

forfeiture

436B-28 Remedies or penalties cumulative

436B-29 Severability

Note

Acceptance of military education, training, or service
(repealed June 30, 2022). L 2012, c 248.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next